New Jersey, session 221, S4270.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section, vapor product means any device that may be used to deliver any aerosolized or vaporized substance to the person inhaling from the device, including, but not limited to, an e-cigarette, e-cigar, e-pipe, vape pen, or e-hookah.  Vapor product includes any component, part, or accessory of the device and also includes any substance that may be aerosolized or vaporized by such device, regardless of whether the substance contains nicotine.  Vapor product does not include any drug, device, or combination product approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration pursuant to the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. s.301 et seq. b.    Notwithstanding any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the New Jersey Transit Corporation shall not display or maintain any advertisement that: (1) proposes the use of, or promotes, a casino game or sports pool, including an Internet casino game or Internet sports pool, unless such advertisement is promoting prevention, education, and treatment programs for compulsive gamblers, such as those provided by the Council on Compulsive Gambling of New Jersey; (2) proposes the use of, or promotes, tobacco or tobacco-related products; or (3) proposes the use of, or promotes, vapor products. 2.    The New Jersey Transit Corporation shall adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to effectuate the purposes of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month following enactment.